Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Establishment and Revision of Rates for Railroad Transportation

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-9-20.
Schedules of transportation rates for passengers and freight by railroad companies as evidence of just and reasonable nature of rates; commission to change and revise schedules periodically.

Any schedule of rates and charges established by the commission for the transportation of passengers and freight shall, in actions brought against any railroad company involving the rates charged by the company for the transportation of any passengers or freight, or cars, including actions involving unjust discrimination in relation to such rates, be deemed and taken in all courts as sufficient evidence that the rates therein fixed are just and reasonable rates or charges for the transportation of passengers and freight and cars upon the railroads. The commission shall, from time to time, and as often as the circumstances may require, change and revise such schedules.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 6; Code 1882, § 719f; Ga. L. 1888, p. 37, § 9; Ga. L. 1889, p. 131, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2190; Civil Code 1910, § 2631; Code 1933, § 93-310.

Cross references.

Commission’s power to determine just and reasonable rates and charges for railroad transportation, §

46-8-20

.

46-9-21.
Giving notice of new and revised rate schedules; giving proof of authenticity of schedules.

When any schedule has been made or revised as provided in Code Section 46-9-20, it shall be the duty of the commission to give notice of such new schedule or of any amendment or revision, by means of circulars, tariff publications, its annual reports, or in such other manner and form as it deems advisable or necessary. After such notice is given, it shall be the duty of all railroad companies affected by the new schedule to post at all of their respective stations, in a conspicuous place, a copy of the schedule for the information of the public, provided that the schedules thus prepared shall not be taken as evidence as provided in Code Section 46-9-20 until schedules have been prepared and published as provided in this Code section.

All such schedules purporting to have been printed and published by the commission as provided in this Code section shall be received and held in all such actions as prima facie the schedules of the commission, without any further proof other than the production of the schedules desired to be used as evidence, together with a certificate of the commission that the same are true copies of the schedules prepared by it for the railroad company therein named and that the same have been duly published as required by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 6; Code 1882, § 719f; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1888, p. 37, § 1; Ga. L. 1889, p. 138, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2191; Civil Code 1910, § 2632; Code 1933, § 93-311.

46-9-22.
Investigation by commission of through rates.

It shall be the duty of the commission to investigate thoroughly all through freight rates from points outside of Georgia to points within Georgia and from points within Georgia to points outside of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 147, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2202; Civil Code 1910, § 2645; Code 1933, § 93-312.

46-9-23.
Report by commission of excessive, unreasonable, or discriminatory
through rates to proper state railroad officials.

Whenever the commission finds that a through rate, whether charged for transportation into or out of Georgia, is in its opinion excessive, unreasonable, or discriminatory, it shall bring this fact to the attention of the officers of the railroad company and urge upon them the propriety of changing such rate.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 147, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2203; Civil Code 1910, § 2646; Code 1933, § 93-313.

46-9-24.
Report by commission of excessive, unreasonable, or discriminatory through rates to Interstate Commerce Commission.

Whenever rates are not changed according to the suggestion of the commission pursuant to Code Section 46-9-23, it shall be the duty of the commission to present the facts, whenever it can legally be done, to the Interstate Commerce Commission and to appeal to it for relief.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 147, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2204; Civil Code 1910, § 2647; Code 1933, § 93-314.

46-9-25.
Representation of commission by Attorney General.

In all work devolving upon the commission pursuant to Code Sections 46-9-22 through 46-9-24, the commission shall receive, upon application, the services of the Attorney General of this state; and he shall also represent the commission, whenever called upon to do so, before the Interstate Commerce Commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 147, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2205; Civil Code 1910, § 2648; Code 1933, § 93-315.

46-9-26.
Commission to prescribe schedule of maximum rates and charges for freight storage by railroad companies.

The commission is required to fix and prescribe a schedule of maximum rates and charges for storage of freight to be made and charged by railroad companies doing business in this state, and to fix at what time after the receipt of freight at place of destination such charges for storage shall begin. The commission shall have the power to vary such rates and charges according to the value and character of the freight stored, the nature of the place of destination, the residence of the consignee, and such other facts as in its judgment should be considered in fixing the same. All of the provisions of this title prescribing the procedure to be followed by the commission in fixing freight and passenger tariffs, hearing complaints of carriers and shippers, and altering and amending freight and passenger tariffs shall apply to the subject of fixing and amending rates and charges for storage.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 149, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2206, 2207; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2649, 2650; Code 1933, § 93-317.